Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB927.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1748.1-A(a) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, added July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), is amended to read:Section 1748.1-A. Enrollee wellness checks.(a) Requirements.--A cyber charter school shall, at least once during any week consisting of at least three full or partial days of academic instruction, ensure that each enrolled student is [able to be] visibly seen and communicated with in real time by a teacher, administrator or other representative of the cyber charter school, either in person or via electronic means, in order to ensure the well-being of the student and verify participation in the educational program. The requirement 1234567891011121314151617181920 under this subsection may be satisfied by students turning on a webcam during synchronous online instruction.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0927PN1039 - 2 - 1234